Utah statutes.
72-11-105.   Authority of committee to accept grants and assistance.

(1)  The committee is authorized to co-operate and contract with and accept grants or other assistance from any other agency of the state of Utah and from any department, bureau, agency, instrumentality, office or officer of the United States and from the trustees or administrators of any fund established in the interest of conservation or recreation.

(2)  The grants or other assistance may be used for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, development, and operation of any of the areas, facilities, activities, or services at any time under, or intended to be brought under, the jurisdiction or control of the committee, expressly including those contemplated by the provisions of this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

